Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-213
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Telemarketing and Prize Promotions Act, the definitions found in sections 86-214 to 86-223 apply.

Laws 1999, LB 469, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-2002;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 75.